Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.550

Compensation of ethics boards.

The citizen members of the legislative ethics board and the members of the executive ethics board shall be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislator members of the legislative ethics board shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120.

[ 1994 c 154 s 227.]